Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-614
Agreement, defined.

Agreement means the bargain of the parties in fact as found in their language or inferred from other circumstances and from rules, regulations, and procedures given the effect of agreements under laws otherwise applicable to a particular transaction.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 376.